Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.421

Advisory group on digital inclusion and technology planning.

Subject to the availability of federal or state funding, the department may convene an advisory group on digital inclusion and technology planning. The advisory group may include, but is not limited to, volunteer representatives from community technology organizations, telecommunications providers, higher education institutions, K-12 education institutions, public health institutions, public housing entities, and local government and other governmental entities that are engaged in community technology activities.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 610; 2009 c 509 s 10. Formerly RCW 43.105.400.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Findings—Intent—Purpose—Effective date—2009 c 509: See notes following RCW 43.330.400.